Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Chapter 3 Compensation and Benefits

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against changing terms and salaries of public officers, see art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const.

As to courts generally, see title 5.

Residency of state employees. —

Laws 2000, ch. 76, § 307, provides: “All employees of the state of Wyoming who are hired after June 30, 2000 shall become residents of and reside within the state within ninety (90) days after commencing employment with the state or their employment is terminated. As used in this section, “employee” means any person who is hired or appointed to perform designated, full-time duties for this state and is paid regular wages from the funds of the state, including university and community college employees, or any appointed member of a board or commission if the terms of appointment do not require residency, but does not mean or include any person hired to perform work on a contractual basis, or any person whose duties require out-of-state residency. The governor may, by executive order, exempt from the provisions of this section any position which he determines requires special education, training or special professional or technical qualifications and which cannot be readily filled from among residents of Wyoming.”

Laws 2000, ch. 76, § 400(b), makes the act effective on July 1, 2000, except as otherwise specifically provided. The act became law without the signature of the governor, in accordance with art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statutory classifications based on population, governmental employee salary or pension statutes, 96 ALR3d 538.

81A C.J.S. States §§ 104 to 119.